California, session 20252026, AB2786.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 324 of the Elections Code is amended to read:324. (a) “General election” means either of the following:(1) The election held throughout the state on the first Tuesday after the first Monday of November in each even-numbered year.(2) Any statewide election held on a regular an established election date as specified in Section 1000.(b) At each general election there shall be elected to the Congress of the United States:(1) One Representative for each congressional district.(2) One Senator, when the general election immediately precedes the commencement of a full term.SEC. 2. Section 9611 of the Elections Code is amended to read:9611. (a) This section applies to district elections conducted in accordance with Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 9300) or school district elections conducted in accordance with Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 9500), if the boundaries of the district or school district contain more than one county. The provisions of this section prevail over any provision in those chapters to the extent they conflict.(b) For the purposes of this section, “lead county” has the following meanings:(1) For district elections, “lead county” means the county with the most voters within the district bounds. boundaries.(2) For school district elections, “lead county” means the county whose superintendent of schools covers the district.(c) The elections official for the lead county shall work with the other counties within the district bounds boundaries to establish the deadlines for the submittal of the measure text, impartial analysis, arguments for and against a district or school district measure measure, and rebuttal arguments. arguments, along with any accompanying forms.(d) Authors shall submit arguments only to the lead county, who shall select which arguments will be printed in the voter information guide in accordance with Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 9300) or Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 9500), as applicable. The elections official for the lead county shall electronically transmit a scanned copy of the selected arguments, along with any accompanying forms, to the elections official of each other county in the district or school district. An elections official who receives arguments selected by the lead county shall include the arguments in the printed and electronic versions of their county voter information guide.(e) The elections official for the lead county shall submit the measure text, impartial analysis, and the selected arguments, along with any accompanying forms, to the other counties within the district boundaries within 24 hours of the author providing those materials to the lead county.SEC. 3. Section 19103 of the Elections Code is amended to read:19103. The Chairperson of the Senate Standing Committee on Elections and Constitutional Amendments and the Chairperson of the Assembly Standing Committee on Elections and Redistricting chairpersons of the elections committees of the Assembly and Senate shall meet with the Secretary of State and assist the Secretary of State to the extent that the participation is not incompatible with their positions as Members of the Legislature. For purposes of this division, the chairpersons of the committees named shall constitute a joint interim legislative committee on the subject of this chapter and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 19200) and shall have the powers and duties imposed upon those committees by the Joint Rules of the Senate and Assembly.SEC. 4. Section 13823 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:13823. (a) If the local agency formation commission approves the formation of a district, with or without amendment, wholly, partially, or conditionally, the board of supervisors shall call and give notice of the election to be held in the proposed district. If the proposed district lies in more than one county, the board of supervisors shall call and give notice of the election to be held in the territory of the proposed district which lies in that county.(b) The election shall be held on the next regular election date established election date, as specified in Section 1000 of the Elections Code, not less than 113 nor more than 150 days after the date the board of supervisors calls and gives notice of the election.(c) Notice of the election shall be published pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code in a newspaper of general circulation circulated within the territory of the proposed district which lies in the county.SEC. 5. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.